Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 18 Annual Census of Children [Repealed.]

16-18-1 — 16-18-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, §§ 13-15; P.L. 1900, ch. 739, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, §§ 15-17; P.L. 1920, ch. 1870, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, §§ 18, 19; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, §§ 12-16; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, §§ 12-16; P.L. 1948, ch. 2028, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §§

16-18-1

— 16-18-5; P.L. 1961, ch. 80, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1978, ch. 85, § 1. Chapter 85 further provided in § 3 that the repeal did not preclude a local school district from conducting any school census.